Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1775
Special purpose share accounts.

Christmas clubs, vacation clubs, and other special purpose share accounts may be established and offered to members under the conditions and restrictions established by the board of directors if provided for in and consistent with the bylaws.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 75.